Arkansas, session 2025, SB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-9-514(a), concerning medical services
and supplies and a change of physician under the Workers' Compensation Law,
is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) If the employee selects a physician, the Workers' Compensation
Commission shall not authorize a change of physician unless the employee
first establishes to the satisfaction of the commission that there is a
compelling reason or circumstance justifying a change.
(2)(A)(i) If the employer selects a physician to encourage
continuity of care and improved outcomes, the claimant may petition the
commission one (1) time only for a change of physician, and if the commission
approves the change with or without a hearing, the commission shall determine
the second physician and shall not be bound by recommendations of claimant or
respondent.
(ii) A physician may make appropriate referrals to
relevant specialists for necessary medical treatment.
*ANS193*
02/24/2025 4:03:43 PM ANS193

SB288
(iii) In addition to a change to the regular
physician under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) of this section, no more than once
per year, the injured employee has the right to petition the commission for a
change of physician to:
(a) Another physician who is associated with a
managed care entity certified by the commission or otherwise agrees to the
commission rules and fee schedule; and
(b) An appropriate specialist who is
associated with a managed care entity certified by the commission or
otherwise agrees to the commission rules and fee schedule.
(iv) This subdivision (a)(2(A) recognizes that an
injured employee may require treatment from multiple specialists and an
injured worker may obtain one (1) change of a specialist per year for each
relevant specialty.
(B) However, if the change desired by the claimant is to a
chiropractic physician, optometrist, or podiatrist, the claimant may make the
change by giving advance written notification to the employer or carrier.
(3) Following establishment of an Arkansas managed care system
as provided in § 11-9-508, subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section shall
become null and void, and thereafter:
(A)(i) The employer shall have the right to select the
initial primary care physician from among those associated with managed care
entities certified by the commission as provided in § 11-9-508.
(ii) Where the employer has contracted with a
managed care organization certified by the commission, the claimant employee,
however, shall be allowed to change physicians by petitioning the commission
one (1) time only for a change of physician to a physician who must either be
associated with the managed care entity chosen by the employer or be the
regular treating physician of the employee who maintains the employee's
medical records and with whom the employee has a bona fide doctor-patient
relationship demonstrated by a history of regular treatment prior to the
onset of the compensable injury but only if the primary care physician agrees
to refer the employee to the managed care entity chosen by the employer for
any specialized treatment, including physical therapy, and only if the
primary care physician agrees to comply with all the rules, terms, and
conditions regarding services performed by the managed care entity chosen by
02/24/2025 4:03:43 PM ANS193

SB288
the employer.
(iii) Where the employer does not have a contract
with a managed care organization certified by the commission, the claimant
employee, however, shall be allowed to change physicians by petitioning the
commission one (1) time only for a change of physician, to a physician who
must either be associated with any managed care entity certified by the
commission or be the regular treating physician of the employee who maintains
the employee's medical records and with whom the employee has a bona fide
doctor-patient relationship demonstrated by a history of regular treatment
prior to the onset of the compensable injury, but only if the primary care
physician agrees to refer the employee to a physician associated with any
managed care entity certified by the commission for any specialized
treatment, including physical therapy, and only if the primary care physician
agrees to comply with all the rules, terms, and conditions regarding services
performed by any managed care entity certified by the commission.
(B)(3) A petition for change of physician shall be expedited by
the commission.



















02/24/2025 4:03:43 PM ANS193